test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-syero_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - серˮ: # Noun 'thing' - partial paradigm /Type 32/
     серˮ+N+Sg+Nom: серˮ
     серˮ+N+Sg+Acc: сермʼ
     серˮ+N+Sg+Gen: серʼ
     серˮ+N+Sg+Dat: сертʼ
     серˮ+N+Sg+Loc: [серкана, серкана]
     серˮ+N+Sg+Abl: серкад
     серˮ+N+Sg+Pros: [сермна, серˮмна]
     серˮ+N+Du+Nom: серкʼ
     серˮ+N+Du+Acc: серкʼ
     серˮ+N+Du+Gen: серкʼ
     серˮ+N+Pl+Nom: серˮ
     серˮ+N+Pl+Acc: серо
     серˮ+N+Pl+Gen: сероˮ
     серˮ+N+Pl+Dat: серкˮ
     серˮ+N+Pl+Loc: [серкаˮна, серкˮна]
     серˮ+N+Pl+Abl: серкат
     серˮ+N+Pl+Pros: сероˮмана

     серˮ+N+Tra: [серˮӈэ, серӈэ]
     серˮ+N+Car: серциˮ
     серˮ+N+Equ: сертремʼ
     серˮ+N+Equ+Lat: сертревʼ

# Possessive forms !Local case forms need to be checked!
     серˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: серм
     серˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: сел  
     серˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: серта 
     серˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: сермиʼ
     серˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: селиʼ
     серˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: сертиʼ
     серˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: сермаˮ
     серˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: селаˮ
     серˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: сертоʼ
     серˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: серм 
     серˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: серт  
     серˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: серта 
     серˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: сермиʼ 
     серˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: сертиʼ
     серˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: сертиʼ
     серˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: сермаˮ 
     серˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: сертаˮ
     серˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: сертоʼ
     серˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: серн 
     серˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: серт 
     серˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: серта 
     серˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: серниʼ 
     серˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: сертиʼ
     серˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: сертиʼ
     серˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: сернаˮ 
     серˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: сертаˮ
     серˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: сертоʼ  
     серˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [серкан, серкани]  
     серˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: серканд  
     серˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: серканда 
     серˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu1: серканиʼ 
     серˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu2: серкандиʼ
     серˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu3: серкандиʼ
     серˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: серканаˮ 
     серˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: серкандаˮ
     серˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: серкандоʼ
     серˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: [серканан, серкнан, серканани]
     серˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: [серкананд, серкнанд] 
     серˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: серкананда 
     серˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: серкананиʼ 
     серˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: серканандиʼ
     серˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: серканандиʼ
     серˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: серкананаˮ 
     серˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: серканандаˮ
     серˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: серканандоʼ
     серˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: [серкадан, серкдан, серкадани]  
     серˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: [серкаданд, серкданд]  
     серˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: серкаданда 
     серˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: серкаданиʼ 
     серˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: серкадандиʼ
     серˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: серкадандиʼ
     серˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: серкаданаˮ 
     серˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: серкадандаˮ
     серˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: серкадандоʼ
     серˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: [сермнан, серˮмнан, сермнани]
     серˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: сермнанд  
     серˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: сермнанда 
     серˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu1: сермнаниʼ 
     серˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu2: сермнандиʼ
     серˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: сермнандиʼ
     серˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: сермнанаˮ 
     серˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: сермнандаˮ
     серˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: сермнандоʼ
     серˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: [серкаюн, серкюн] 
     серˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2: [серкаюд, серкюд]  
     серˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3: [серкаюда, серкюда] 
     серˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1: серкаюниʼ
     серˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2: серкаюдиʼ
     серˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3: серкаюдиʼ
     серˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1: серкаюнаˮ
     серˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2: серкаюдаˮ
     серˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3: серкаюдоʼ
     серˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1: [серкаюн, серкюн]  
     серˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxSg2: [серкаюд, серкюд]
     серˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxSg3: [серкаюда, серкюда] 
     серˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxDu1: серкаюниʼ
     серˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxDu2: серкаюдиʼ
     серˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxDu3: серкаюдиʼ
     серˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxPl1: серкаюнаˮ
     серˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxPl2: серкаюдаˮ
     серˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxPl3: серкаюдоʼ
     серˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1: [серкаюн, серкюн]  
     серˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxSg2: [серкают, серкют]  
     серˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxSg3: [серкаюта, серкюта]
     серˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxDu1: серкаюниʼ
     серˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxDu2: серкаютиʼ
     серˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxDu3: серкаютиʼ
     серˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxPl1: серкаюнаˮ
     серˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxPl2: серкаютаˮ
     серˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxPl3: серкаютоʼ
     серˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: [серон, серони]
     серˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: серод   
     серˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: серода  
     серˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: серониʼ 
     серˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: серодиʼ 
     серˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: серодиʼ 
     серˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: серонаˮ 
     серˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: серодаˮ 
     серˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: серодоʼ 
     серˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: [серон, серони]
     серˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: серод   
     серˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: серода  
     серˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu1: серониʼ 
     серˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu2: серодиʼ 
     серˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: серодиʼ 
     серˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: серонаˮ 
     серˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: серодаˮ 
     серˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: серодоʼ 
     серˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: [сероˮн, сероˮни] 
     серˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: серот   
     серˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: серота  
     серˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu1: сероˮниʼ
     серˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu2: серотиʼ 
     серˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: серотиʼ 
     серˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: сероˮнаˮ 
     серˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: серотаˮ 
     серˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: серотоʼ 
     серˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: серкаˮн 
     серˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: серкаˮн
     серˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: серкат 
     серˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: серката 
     серˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu1: серкаˮниʼ 
     серˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu2: серкатиʼ 
     серˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: серкатиʼ 
     серˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: серкаˮнаˮ 
     серˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: серкатаˮ 
     серˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: серкатоʼ 
     серˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: [серкаˮнан, серкˮнан] 
     серˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: серкаˮнат
     серˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: серкаˮната 
     серˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: серкаˮнаниʼ
     серˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: серкаˮнатиʼ
     серˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: серкаˮнатиʼ
     серˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: серкаˮнанаˮ
     серˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: серкаˮнатаˮ
     серˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: серкаˮнатоʼ
     серˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: [серкатан, серктан] 
     серˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: серкатат 
     серˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: серкатата 
     серˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: серкатаниʼ
     серˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: серкататиʼ
     серˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: серкататиʼ
     серˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: серкатанаˮ
     серˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: серкататаˮ
     серˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: серкататоʼ
     серˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: сероˮманан  
     серˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg2: сероˮманат  
     серˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg3: сероˮманата 
     серˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu1: сероˮмананиʼ
     серˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu2: сероˮманатиʼ
     серˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: сероˮманатиʼ
     серˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: сероˮмананаˮ
     серˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: сероˮманатаˮ
     серˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: сероˮманатоʼ

# Predestinative 

     серˮ+N+Pred+Abs: серт
     серˮ+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: сертав 
     серˮ+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg2: сертар  
     серˮ+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg3: сертада
     серˮ+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: сертав
     серˮ+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg2: сертамд
     серˮ+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg3: сертамда
     серˮ+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: сертан
     серˮ+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg2: сертанд
     серˮ+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg3: сертанда
     серˮ+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu1: сертамиʼ
     серˮ+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu2: сертариʼ
     серˮ+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu3: сертадиʼ
     серˮ+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu1: сертамиʼ
     серˮ+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu2: сертамдиʼ
     серˮ+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu3: сертамдиʼ
     серˮ+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu1: сертаниʼ
     серˮ+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu2: сертандиʼ
     серˮ+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu3: сертандиʼ
     серˮ+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl1: сертаваˮ
     серˮ+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl2: сертараˮ
     серˮ+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl3: сертадоʼ
     серˮ+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl1: сертаваˮ
     серˮ+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl2: сертамдаˮ
     серˮ+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl3: сертамдоʼ
     серˮ+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl1: сертанаˮ
     серˮ+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl2: сертандаˮ
     серˮ+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl3: сертандоʼ
     
# Predicative (Nominal conjugation)

     серˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: сертмʼ
     серˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: серт  
     серˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: серˮ
     серˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: серниʼ
     серˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: сертиʼ
     серˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: серкʼ
     серˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: сермаˮ
     серˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: сертаˮ # селаˮ ?
     серˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: серˮ 
     серˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: сертамзь
     серˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: сертась 
     серˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: серць   
     серˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: сернинзь
     серˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: сертинзь
     серˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: серканзь
     серˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: сермаць 
     серˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: сертаць # селаць ?
     серˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: сераць
